Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3226.13
Flood protection and water quality
enhancement bonds; fees to fiscal agents authorized; warrants and bonds; conditions.

The board of
directors of a natural resources district issuing bonds pursuant to section
2-3226.10 may agree to pay fees to fiscal agents in connection with the placement
of warrants or bonds of the district. Such warrants and bonds shall be subject
to the same conditions as provided by section 2-3254.07 for improvement project
area bonds and such other conditions as the board of directors determines
appropriate.

Laws 2009, LB160, § 4.